Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.100

Gifts, grants and endowments—Receipt and expenditure.

The commission shall have authority to receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and benefit of the purposes of the commission and to expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of said gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 10.]